Utah statutes.
78A-6-606 (Superseded 07/01/11).    Suspension of license for certain offenses.

(1)  This section applies to a minor who is at least 13 years of age when found by the court to be within its jurisdiction by the commission of an offense under:

(a)  Section 32A-12-209;

(b)  Section 32A-12-209.5;

(c)  Section 32A-12-223;

(d)  Section 58-37-8;

(e)  Title 58, Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act;

(f)  Title 58, Chapter 37b, Imitation Controlled Substances Act; or

(g)  Subsection 76-9-701(1).

(2)  If the court hearing the case determines that the minor committed an offense under Section 58-37-8 or Title 58, Chapter 37a or 37b, the court shall prepare and send to the Driver License Division of the Department of Public Safety an order to suspend that minor's driving privileges.

(3) (a)  The court hearing the case shall suspend the minor's driving privileges if:

(i)  the minor violated Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5 or Subsection 76-9-701(1); and

(ii)  the violation described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) was committed on or after July 1, 2009.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirement in Subsection (3)(a), the court may reduce the suspension period required under Section 53-3-219 if:

(i)  the violation is the minor's first violation of Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5 or Subsection 76-9-701(1); and

(ii)  the minor completes an educational series as defined in Section 41-6a-501.

(c)  The suspension periods and requirements that were in effect prior to July 1, 2009, apply:

(i)  to a minor that violated Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5 or Subsection 76-9-701(1); and

(ii)  for a violation that was committed prior to July 1, 2009.

(d)  If a minor commits a proof of age violation, as defined in Section 32A-12-223:

(i)  the court shall forward a record of adjudication to the Department of Public Safety for a first or subsequent violation; and

(ii)  the minor's driving privileges will be suspended:

(A)  for a period of at least one year under Section 53-3-220 for a first conviction for a violation of Section 32A-12-223; or

(B)  for a period of two years for a second or subsequent conviction for a violation of Section 32A-12-223.

(4)  A minor's license shall be suspended under Section 53-3-219 when a court issues an order suspending the minor's driving privileges for a violation of:

(a)  Section 32A-12-209;

(b)  Section 32A-12-209.5;

(c)  Section 58-37-8;

(d)  Title 58, Chapter 37a or 37b; or

(e)  Subsection 76-9-701(1).

(5)  When the Department of Public Safety receives the arrest or conviction record of a person for a driving offense committed while the person's license is suspended under this section, the Department of Public Safety shall extend the suspension for a like period of time.

